Maine, session 132, LD1812.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 110, sub-c. 15 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 15
LOANS FOR TRADE TOOLS PROGRAM
§1100-HH. Loans for Trade Tools Program
1. Definitions. As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Accredited college" means an institution of higher education that is accredited by
a regional accrediting association or by one of the specialized accrediting agencies
recognized by the United States Secretary of Education.
B. "Eligible borrower" means a graduate of an accredited college who has completed
a degree or certificate program in a trade profession.
C. "Fund" means the Loans for Trade Tools Fund established in subsection 5.
D. "Program" means the Loans for Trade Tools Program established in subsection 2.
E. "Regional accrediting association" means a regional accrediting association that is
either:
(1) One of the United States accrediting associations or commissions that comprise
the Council of Regional Accrediting Commissions or successor organization; or
(2) An accrediting association, commission or government entity not in the United
States that is equivalent to an association or commission referred to in
subparagraph (1) that is a reliable authority on the quality of the education or
training provided by the institutions of higher education it accredits or charters and
that applies standards substantially equivalent to those used by one of the United
States accrediting associations or commissions that compose the Council of
Regional Accrediting Commissions or successor organization.
F. "Trade tools" means the tools and equipment needed for employment in a trade.
2. Loans for Trade Tools Program established. The Loans for Trade Tools Program
is established within the authority for the purpose of making low-interest loans to a graduate
of an accredited college for the purchase of tools and equipment necessary for the graduate's
employment in a trade.
3. Loans. The authority shall provide low-interest loans to eligible borrowers pursuant
to this subsection.
A. The interest rate may not exceed 2.0% per year.
B. The repayment period my not exceed 10 years.
C. The maximum loan amount is $20,000 per eligible borrower.
D. The maximum aggregate of loans made pursuant to this subsection may not exceed
$1,000,000 per year or the funds available in the fund, whichever is lower.
Page 1 - 132LR1301(01)

The authority shall administer the disbursement of loans in a manner consistent with the
disbursement of other student loan repayment programs administered by the authority.
4. Loan forgiveness. An eligible borrower who obtains a loan pursuant to subsection
3 and who maintains full-time employment in that eligible borrower's trade for at least 5
years may have the outstanding balance of the loan forgiven upon application to the
authority for loan forgiveness. As used in this subsection, "full-time employment" means
employment with a normal workweek of 32 hours or more.
5. Loans for Trade Tools Fund. The Loans for Trade Tools Fund is established as a
nonlapsing fund administered by the authority. The fund receives any funds appropriated
or allocated to the fund. The authority may accept and deposit into the fund monetary gifts,
donations or other contributions from public or private sources for the purposes specified
in this section. The fund must be held separate and apart from all other money, funds and
accounts. Any repayment of loans made pursuant to subsection 3 must be deposited into
the fund.
6. Certification for employer tax credit. The authority shall establish an application,
review and approval process for the certification of an employer seeking the tax credit
provided in Title 36, section 5217-G.
7. Outreach and education. The authority shall conduct outreach and education to
ensure that students and their families and colleges are aware of the program.
8. Rules. The authority shall adopt rules to implement the program, including the
application process, eligibility standards, trade tools that qualify for a loan and the method
of disbursing loans and collecting repayments. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection
are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5217-G is enacted to read:
§5217-G. Employer tax credit for trade tool expense reimbursement
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Accredited college" has the same meaning as in Title 10, section 1100-HH,
subsection 1, paragraph A.
B. "Eligible employee" means a graduate of an accredited college who has completed
a degree or certificate program in a trade profession.
C. "Employer" has the same meaning as in Title 26, section 1043, subsection 9.
D. "Qualified employer" means an employer that receives a certificate from the
Finance Authority of Maine pursuant to Title 10, section 1100-HH, subsection 6
certifying that employer's qualified reimbursement amount.
E. "Qualified reimbursement" means an amount paid by an employer to an eligible
employee or directly to a vendor for the purchase of trade tools for an eligible employee
within the first year of employment with that employer.
F. "Trade tools" means the tools and equipment needed for employment in a trade.
2. Credit allowed. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a qualified
employer is allowed a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by this Part equal to
25% of the qualified reimbursements made by the qualified employer. The maximum
Page 2 - 132LR1301(01)

413 credit allowed under this subsection is $5,000 per eligible employee. Unused credit may
424 not be carried over from year to year.
3. Credit not allowed. The tax credit provided under this section is not allowed for
trade tools for which the eligible employee received a loan or forgiveness of a loan pursuant
to the Loans for Trade Tools Program under Title 10, chapter 110, subchapter 15.
4. Application for credit. Prior to claiming the credit under this section, an employer
shall apply for and obtain certification of the employer's qualified reimbursements for the
tax year for which the credit is claimed.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
FINANCE AUTHORITY OF MAINE
Loans for Trade Tools Program Fund N526
Initiative: Provides funds for low-interest loans to graduates of accredited colleges for tools
and equipment needed by those graduates for their employment.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000